Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2508
Department of Health and Human Services; duties.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall be responsible for providing or contracting for services.

(2) Whenever possible, the medical assistance program prescribed in the Medical Assistance Act shall be used for payment of services coordination.

(3) It is the intent of this section that the department shall apply for and implement a Title XIX medicaid waiver as a way to assist in the provision of services coordination to eligible infants or toddlers with disabilities and their families.

Laws 1991, LB 701, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 520, § 13;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 213;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 58;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 55;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 142.

Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.